California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
(History: Added by renumbering Section 418 (as added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 60) by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 218.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

409.10.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 419 (as added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 60) by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 219.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

409.11.

It is the intent of the Legislature that qualification for the benefits and protections conferred upon service members, as defined by Section 400, by this chapter apply retroactively to September 11, 2001. However, it is also the intent of the Legislature that the benefits and protections that attach to qualified service members under this chapter apply only on a prospective basis.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 420 (as added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 60) by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 220.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

409.13.

(a) To the extent permitted by federal law and the California Constitution, any principal and interest on any financial obligation or liability bearing interest and incurred by a member of the California National Guard or their surviving spouse, or surviving domestic partner, or any principal and interest on any financial obligation or liability bearing interest incurred by a member of the California National Guard for which the beneficiary of that member is liable, shall be deferred for a period of six months after the death of the member without penalty or accrual of any additional interest.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Interest” includes service charges, renewal charges, fees, or any other charges with respect to any obligation or liability.

(2) “Beneficiary” means a beneficiary of the deceased member of the California National Guard who is or has become, after the member’s death, liable for any of the member’s financial obligations or liabilities bearing interest.

(c) This section shall only apply:

(1) To a member of the California National Guard that is killed in the line of duty in the service of the state or federal government.

(2) When a member’s surviving spouse, surviving domestic partner, or other beneficiary provides written notice of the death of the member to the financial institution to which they are liable and from which they are requesting deferral of interest and payments as set forth in this section.

(3) To a financial obligation or liability bearing interest that was created between a private entity and a member of the California National Guard or their surviving
 spouse or surviving domestic partner,
 or to a financial obligation or liability bearing interest that was created between a private entity and a member of the National Guard for which the beneficiary of that member is liable, before that member’s entry
 into service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 50.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

409.14.

A service member or other person seeking to enforce rights pursuant to this chapter shall not be required to pay a filing fee or court costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 385, Sec. 11.   (AB 2365)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

409.15.

(a) Any person who receives a good faith request from a service member for relief pursuant to this chapter and who believes the request is incomplete or otherwise not legally sufficient, or that the service member is not entitled to the relief requested, shall, within 30 days of the request, provide the service member with a written response acknowledging the request, setting forth the person’s basis for believing or asserting that the request is incomplete or not legally sufficient, or that the service member is not entitled to the relief requested. The response shall clearly identify the specific information or materials that are missing from the request and that would be required to grant the relief requested, and
 provide contact information, including a mailing address and telephone number, which the service member can use to contact the person.

(b) If the person fails to make such a response in the timeframe set forth in this section, the person waives any objection to the request, and the service member shall be entitled to the relief requested.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 555, Sec. 17.   (AB 3212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Equipment and Accommodations [410. - 444.]



  ARTICLE 1. Funds, Arms, and Equipment [410. - 424.]

410.

The National Guard, Naval Militia, and unorganized militia when called into active service shall be provided by the State with the supplies and equipment, not supplied by the United States, necessary for the proper performance of functions authorized or prescribed by the laws and regulations of the State and the United States.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

411.

The board of supervisors of any county or the legislative body of any city may appropriate money from the general fund of such county or city for the use, benefit, or assistance of the National Guard or Naval Militia or for National Guard or Naval Militia purposes within such county or city only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 728.)
-------------------------------------------

412.

Any officer who is accountable for any Federal, State, or company funds or property who fails or neglects to deliver over such funds or property to the person designated by proper authority to relieve such officer, shall be charged with all shortages thereof not covered by the receipt obtained by such officer from the person to whom he has delivered the same.

Quartermasters and supply officers are accountable and responsible for all property issued to the headquarters to which they are attached or with which they are on duty.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

412.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Adjutant General may do all of the following:

(1) Establish support programs, including, but not limited to, morale, welfare, recreational, training, and educational programs for the benefit of the Military Department, its components, and its soldiers, airmen, and cadets, including their family members. These programs shall be collectively known as the California Military Department Foundation.

(2) Establish, construct, or acquire facilities or equipment for the purposes specified in paragraph (1).

(3) Adopt rules and regulations for all of the following:

(A) The California Military Department Foundation.

(B) The solicitation and acceptance of funds authorized pursuant to subdivision (b).

(C) The establishment, deposit, and expenditure of military post, welfare, or similar unit funds.

(4) Perform other acts as may be necessary, desirable, or proper to carry out the purposes of this section.

(5) (A) The Adjutant General and the Military Department may enter into agreements with nonprofit military or veteran foundations, military organizations, or other entities
 to conduct California Military Department Support Fund activities pursuant to established rules and regulations. An agreement may be in the form of a memorandum of agreement that describes the roles and responsibilities of each party.

(B) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) and Section 13340 of the Government Code, the Military Department may expend money in the California Military Department Support Fund to pay a nonprofit military or veteran foundation, military organization, or other entity for the sole purpose of supporting California Military Department Support Fund activities pursuant to this paragraph if that money was donated for those purposes. Payments pursuant to this subparagraph may include an advance payment to a
 nonprofit military or veteran foundation, military organization, or other entity with instructions regarding the use of the moneys. A nonprofit military or veteran foundation, military organization, or other entity shall return any balance of unused moneys to the Military Department within 30 days of the expiration of any agreement or memorandum of agreement.

(b) (1) There is the California Military Department Support Fund established in the State Treasury. Except as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), the money in the California Military Department Support Fund is available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, solely for the purposes prescribed by this section.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that funds appropriated to the Military
 Department, as provided by this section, be used to supplement, not supplant, funding appropriated to the Military Department pursuant to any other law for the purposes prescribed by this section.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the Adjutant General and the Military Department may solicit and accept funds or other donations that shall be deposited in the California Military Department Support Fund. In-kind donations may be accepted and accounted for pursuant to rules and regulations
 promulgated by the department.

(2) Section 11005 of the Government Code does not apply to the acceptance of funds or other donations pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) Except for the purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code
 does not apply to the expenditure of funds or donations for the purposes of this section.

(d) For accounting and recordkeeping purposes, the California Military Department Support Fund shall be deemed to be a single special fund, and special funds therein shall constitute and be deemed to be a separate account in the California Military Department Support Fund. Each account or fund shall be available for expenditure only for the purposes as are now or may hereafter be provided by law.

(e) The
 California National Guard Military Family Relief Fund is hereby repealed, and all moneys remaining in the fund on the date the fund is repealed shall be deposited into the California Military Department Support Fund.

(f) On or before March 31 of each year, the Adjutant General shall conduct an internal audit of the fund established in accordance with
 subdivision (b) and report the findings of the audit to the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 45, Sec. 42.   (AB 127)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

413.

All moneys including company funds, of which the commanding officer or other officer or employee is the custodian, shall be deposited in a national bank or a bank incorporated under the laws of this State. All moneys, funds, bonds, securities, property or other assets held in trust for or on behalf of any National Guard units or organizations or the commanding officers thereof, by the State of California, the State Treasurer, or other public or trust officer, may be paid to such units or organizations to be used for military purposes upon demand of the National Guard units or organizations or the commanding officers thereof provided the Adjutant General shall have approved such payment. If the National Guard units or organizations which made said payment or delivered said property in trust is or are not in existence, then said moneys, funds, bonds, securities, property or other assets so held in trust may be paid or delivered upon like demand to the successor or successors of said units or organizations. A National Guard unit or units or organizations shall be a successor or successors within the meaning of this section if it or they is or are located at, and its or their members reside in, the same general area as its or their predecessor. The order of the Adjutant General determining that a unit or units or an organization is or are a successor or successors within the meaning of this section shall be conclusive of the fact.

If no National Guard unit or units is or are organized in said general area as a successor or successors then the said moneys, funds, bonds, securities, property or other assets so held in trust may be paid or delivered upon like demand and approval to the next highest organized unit in the echelon of command that includes the said general area of said former units or organizations that may have deposited said property or assets in trust as aforesaid.

All money, funds, bonds, securities, property or other asssets paid or delivered to any National Guard unit or units or organization pursuant to this section shall be used for military purposes and the benefit of such unit or units or organization receiving the same, and if not so used shall be paid or delivered to the Adjutant General upon his demand and who shall in turn transmit the same to the State Treasurer in augmentation of the appropriations for military purposes. All of said units and organizations shall render an accounting to the Adjutant General upon demand and at least once in each calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 330.)
-------------------------------------------

414.

Every officer and enlisted person to whom public property has been issued shall be personally responsible to the state for that property. No one shall be relieved from this responsibility, unless it is shown, to the satisfaction of the Governor, that the loss or destruction of the property was unavoidable and in no way the fault of the person responsible for the loss. In all other cases the value of the property lost or destroyed, in the amount determined by a surveying officer or a board as herein provided, shall be charged against the person at fault or, with the concurrence of the appropriate commanding officer, against the command to or for which it had been issued, and if not relieved from the charge by the Governor, there shall be an indebtedness from that person or command to the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 36.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

415.

If the commanding officer of the organization charged does not concur in the finding of the surveying officer, then the value of lost or destroyed property and the person or command to be charged therewith shall be determined by the board consisting of the commanding officer of the organization in which such property is lost and two disinterested officers not below the grade of major appointed by The Adjutant General. A decision of a majority of the board so constituted shall be final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1183.)
-------------------------------------------

416.

(a) When the amount determined by a board, as provided in Section 415, as the value of lost, damaged, or destroyed property is charged to a person, it shall be deducted from any pay or allowance due or to become due to the person from the state. Money due to the state for any reason, with or without the action of a board, from a member of the active militia, a member of the unorganized militia when called for active duty, or any civilian employee of the Office of the Adjutant General shall be deducted or withheld from any money due or to become due that member or civilian employee from the state, including any pay and allowances payable pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 320) of Chapter 5 of
 Part 1 of Division 2. When the amount is charged to a command, it shall be deducted one-half in successive calendar years from any allowance or money due or to become due to it from the state, except that on the disbandment of a command any indebtedness then existing and any indebtedness as may be charged to it upon a final settlement of property accounts shall, as soon as determined, be paid out of its military funds or unexpended appropriations.

(b) An action may be maintained in the name of the people of the state in any court of competent jurisdiction by the Attorney General, upon request of the Adjutant General, to recover from a member of the active militia, a member of the unorganized militia when called for active duty, or any civilian employee of the Office of the Adjutant General or their sureties any indebtedness to the
 state remaining unpaid upon final determination of the indebtedness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 51.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

417.

The transportation of arms, equipment, and military stores issued to troops or received by the State and all other military transportation shall be contracted for by the Adjutant General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 393.)
-------------------------------------------

418.

All property purchased out of the moneys allowed by the State for the use and convenience of the militia is the property of the State and shall be enumerated on the property returns next following its purchase.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

419.

No member of the militia shall wear or use, except when on military duty, or by special permission of his commanding officer, any uniform or other article of military property belonging to the State or to the organization of which he is a member.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

420.

No officer in charge of public property for military use shall transfer any portion thereof, either as a loan or permanently, without the authority of the Governor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

421.

Any person who secretes, sells, disposes of, offers for sale, purchases, retains after demand made by a commissioned officer of the National Guard or of the unorganized militia when called into the service of the state or Naval Militia, or in any manner pawns or pledges any arms, uniforms, equipment, or military or naval property of the state or of the United States, or of any organization of the active militia or of the unorganized militia when called into the service of the state is guilty of a felony if said arms, uniforms, equipments, or military or naval property of the state or of the United States is of a value of
 nine hundred fifty dollars ($950)
 or more, otherwise such person is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 28, Sec. 5.   (SB 18 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

422.

Any person other than an officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person of the California National Guard, or of the unorganized militia when called into the service of the state or of the State Guard or who may be appointed under Section 141 or who may be authorized by Sections 502, 502.1, or 502.2 or who may be a member of the Naval Militia of this state, or who may be a member of the military forces of another state or of the United States Army, United States Air Force, United States Navy, United States Marine Corps, United States Space Force, United States Coast Guard Service or United States or State Forest Service, or personnel of the Department of Fish and Wildlife, or members of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or an inmate of any
 veterans’ or soldiers’ home, or other person authorized by the laws of the United States or of this state, who at any time wears the uniform of the United States Army, United States Air Force, or United States Navy, or of the armed forces of the United States or any organization thereof, or National Guard or Naval Militia, or any part of that uniform, or a uniform or part of a uniform similar thereto, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding 60 days, or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 379, Sec. 14.   (AB 1715)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

423.

Whenever the National Guard or Naval Militia, or any part thereof, is in active service or is called into active service, no civic organization or member thereof shall parade or appear in uniform in the locality where the National Guard or Naval Militia is in service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

424.

Any person, who at any time wears the uniform of, or a uniform similar to that of, a foreign military or semimilitary organization without being a member thereof and being entitled to do so, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding 60 days or by both such fine and imprisonment.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the wearing of such uniforms by actors during the filming of any motion picture or the presentation of any stage play.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 228.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Armories [430. - 439.1.]

430.

As used in this article, “armory” means and includes any building or portion thereof, rifle range, camp site, airport, arsenal, vessel, quarters, accommodations, or training facilities devoted to the use of the militia.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 295.)
-------------------------------------------

431.

(a) The Adjutant General may, either directly or through armory boards, or through subordinate commanders, lease or otherwise authorize the use of, by any person for any lawful purpose, manage, supervise all activities in, perform all necessary military duties with respect to and control all armories that are built or acquired by the state, that come into possession or control of the state, or that are erected, purchased, leased, or provided or contributed to, in whole or in part, by any city, county, political subdivision, or district, or by anyone, for armory purposes.

(b) The Adjutant General may contract with the United States for the operation of any armory for purposes of
 training of federal military personnel, with provision that all state costs related to that operation shall be reimbursed by the United States.

(c) All revenues or income from any armory shall be paid to the Adjutant General who shall account for the revenues or income to the Controller at the close of each month in the form that the Controller prescribes and shall deposit the revenues and income into the Treasury to the credit of the Armory Discretionary Improvement Account, which is hereby created, in the General Fund. The revenues and income in the account shall be available, when appropriated, to the Adjutant General, for allocation for the maintenance, repairs, improvements, and operating expenses necessary or desirable for increased or improved community utilization of the facilities of the armory from which the revenues and income were derived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 123.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

431.5.

There is in the State Treasury the Army Facilities Agreement Program Income Fund. Any revenue received from nonfederal tenants’ use of Military Department facilities shall be deposited into the fund. The money in the fund is available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of maintenance, repairs, improvements, and other activities necessary to maintain Army National Guard facilities and shall be expended pursuant to the National Guard Bureau Army Facilities Program Cooperative Agreement or be returned to the United States Property and Fiscal Office of California pursuant to the Army Facilities Program Cooperative Agreement requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 45, Sec. 43.   (AB 127)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

432.

For the control and management of the armories, the Adjutant General may cause to be established from the personnel of the organized militia armory boards, the personnel of which shall serve without pay. Such boards, subject to the direction of the Adjutant General, shall control, manage, and supervise all activities in armories and may rent to or otherwise authorize the use of such armories by persons and organizations including those not connected with the National Guard and Naval Militia. Such boards shall remit all revenues therefrom at least once each month to the Adjutant General who shall account for and deposit such revenues pursuant to Section 431.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2182.)
-------------------------------------------

433.

The Adjutant General may lease on behalf of the State armories necessary for the use of the militia.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

433.5.

All state armories may be used for emergency purposes on such terms and conditions as shall be mutually agreeable to the Military Department and the Office of Emergency Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 402.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

434.

(a) The Adjutant General, under the direction of the Governor, shall make and enforce regulations for the government and control of armories. Where appropriations have been made therefor, the Adjutant General may purchase, receive by donation, or otherwise acquire or lease real estate for armory or storage purposes. Where appropriations have been made therefor, the Adjutant General may construct and build armories, buildings, structures, and facilities required for the use of the Adjutant General and the military forces of this state.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Adjutant General may cooperate and contract with authorized representatives of the United States government in carrying out the provisions of this section, if the Adjutant General determines that it is in the best interest of the state. In determining if this course of action is in the best interest of the state, the Adjutant General shall make findings in writing, and shall consider all of the following criteria:

(1) The contracting method selected results in the least cost to the state.

(2) The contracting method selected assures that any contracts requiring federal funds are awarded in the same federal fiscal year of appropriation by Congress.

(3) The contracting method selected will result in full compliance with federal military construction standards.

(4) The contracting method selected will ensure full compliance with all state building codes.

(c) In carrying out the provisions of subdivision (b), the Adjutant General shall do both of the following:

(1) Coordinate with the Department of General Services to utilize the department for any project that uses state matching funds.

(2) Submit to the Department of General Services a written annual summary of the findings required by subdivision (b).

(d) For any project using 100 percent state funds and built entirely on state owned land, the Adjutant General shall indicate to the Department of General Services that the construction project is being constructed in accordance with the California Building Standards Code set forth in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 190, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

435.

(a) The Director of General Services, with the approval of the Adjutant General, may lease for not more than 99 years or sell for fair market value, upon terms and conditions and subject to any reservations and exceptions as may be determined to be in the best interests of the State, any real property held for armory purposes. Real property shall not be sold or leased pursuant to this subdivision unless the Legislature, by statute, approves the sale or lease of the property.

(b) (1) An armory shall be offered for sale to any local agency, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 54221 of the Government Code, before being offered for sale to private entities or individuals.

(2) For
 purposes of paragraph (1), fair market value shall be determined by an appraisal undertaken and approved by the Director of General Services.

(3) The Department of General Services, subject to this subdivision, shall maintain a list of armories authorized for sale in a conspicuous place on its Internet Web site. The Department of General Services shall provide local agencies and, upon request, members of the public, with electronic notification of updates to the list of properties.

(4) To be considered as a potential priority buyer of the armory, a local agency shall notify the Department of General Services of its interest in the armory within 90 days of the Department of General Services posting on its Internet Web site the notice of the availability of the armory property. When more than one local agency expresses an interest in the armory, the Department of General Services
 shall transfer the armory to the local agency offering the highest amount of money above fair market value.

(5) If no local agency is interested, or an agreement, as provided above, is not reached, then the disposal of the armory to private entities or individuals shall be pursuant to a public bidding process designed to obtain the highest most certain return for the state from a responsible bidder, and any transaction based on that bidding process shall be deemed to be the fair market value.

(c) As to an armory sold pursuant to this section, the Director of General Services shall except and reserve to the state all mineral deposits, as described in Section 6407 of the Public Resources Code, together with the right to prospect for, mine, and remove the deposits. If, however, the Director of General Services determines that there is little or no potential for mineral deposits, the
 reservation may be without surface right of entry above a depth of 500 feet, or the rights to prospect for, mine, and remove the deposits shall be limited to those areas of the armory conveyed that the director determines to be reasonably necessary for the removal of the deposits.

(d) There is in the State Treasury the Armory Fund. All net proceeds from the sale or lease of an armory shall be deposited in the fund. The money in the fund is available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the maintenance of existing armories, and for the acquisition or construction of new or replacement armories, including, but not limited to, the cost of design. The disposition of armory properties is not subject to subdivision (g) of Section 11011 of the Government Code.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “net proceeds” are the gross proceeds less:

(1) Outstanding reimbursements due to the Property Acquisition Law Money Account for costs incurred by the Department of General Services in selling an armory property.

(2) All costs directly related to the disposition of an armory, including, but not limited to, all costs and expenses incurred by the Department of General Services, as specified in subdivision (f).

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), the Department of General Services shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, use funds from the Property Acquisition Law Money Account for the purposes of selling armory properties. The Director of Finance may approve loans from the General Fund to the Property Acquisition Law Money Account.

(g) The sale of an armory shall be made on an “as is” basis and
 is exempt from Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 21100) of Division 13 of the Public Resources Code. Upon vesting title of the armory to the purchaser or transferee of the armory, the purchaser or transferee is subject to any local governmental land use entitlement requirements and to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 21100) of Division 13 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 162.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

436.

The Adjutant General may receive by donation or dedication any property which may be used for armory purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

437.

The Adjutant General, in the name of the people of the State of California, with the approval of the Department of General Services, may acquire any property necessary for armory purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1239.)
-------------------------------------------

438.

(a) The Adjutant General may appoint a Community Advisory Committee to advise the Adjutant General on matters involving the role and function of California National Guard members and facilities in communities around the state.

(b) If the advisory committee is appointed pursuant to subdivision (a), the Adjutant General shall determine the number of members to be appointed to the committee, which shall include representation from cities and counties and organizations or associations which represent the interests of homeless persons. The members of the committee shall serve without compensation.

(c) The committee may advise the Adjutant General on issues including, but not limited to, the use of the California National Guard armories as shelters for the homeless. It is not the function of the committee to advise the Adjutant General on matters pertaining to the California National Guard which do not directly impact local communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 901, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

439.

Any city, city and county or county may acquire, provide, and maintain buildings, halls, meeting places, and supply stations for the use of the United States Department of the Army, the United States Department of the Navy, the United States Department of the Air Force, the California National Guard, and for such purposes the governing body of the city, or city and county, and the board of supervisors of any county may:

(a) Purchase, receive by donation, donate, dedicate, condemn, lease for the use of the Adjutant General for a term not to exceed 99 years or as provided in Section 37392 of the Government Code, or acquire real or personal property, with or without improvements, and erect such buildings, halls, meeting places, and supply stations thereon.

(b) Purchase, construct, lease for the use of the Adjutant General for a term not to exceed 99 years or as provided in Section 37392 of the Government Code, furnish, or repair such buildings, and property and provide for the proper maintenance and management thereof.

(c) Enter into agreements on behalf of the city, city and county, or county with the Secretary of the Department of the Army, Secretary of the Department of the Air Force, and the Secretary of the Department of the Navy of the United States, and the Adjutant General of the State of California for the use and occupancy of such buildings, including any buildings constructed as memorials or for other purposes.

(d) Establish a fund for the purposes hereof, levy a special tax for such purposes, and incur in the manner provided by law a bonded indebtedness on behalf of the city, city and county or the county for any of the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1954, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

439.1.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the Military Department is unable to perform its security, emergency response, and social and community missions due to deficiencies in the physical condition and suitability of some of its armories, and according to a 2006 Bureau of State Audit report, at least 87 percent of the 109 armories in California are in need of improvement.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that the Military Department has adequate facilities to perform its security, emergency response, and social and community missions.

(c) The Military Department shall, on or before April 1, 2008, and each year thereafter, submit a report to the Legislature on the status of all California armories. For each armory, the report shall include:

(1) The location of the armory.

(2) The utilization of the facilities of the armory for military missions, emergency response, and community and social services.

(3) The physical condition of the facilities of the armory for its current missions and uses.

(4) Any identified improvement, renovation, and modernization projects for the facilities of the armory, and the total estimated costs to complete these projects.

(5) The status of recent improvements undertaken at the facilities of the armory.

(6) An 18-month projection of all work and improvements that will be completed on the facilities of the armory.

(7) The projected workload and staffing necessary for the maintenance, repairs, improvements, and operating expenses of the facilities of the armory.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 742, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Los Angeles Air Force Base Housing [440. - 444.]

440.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Housing and Community Development, the County of Los Angeles, the City of Inglewood, the City of Hawthorne, and the City of El Segundo, may enter into a joint powers agreement, pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, for the purposes of providing a short-term solution to the problem of providing housing for military personnel stationed at Los Angeles Air Force Base.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1028, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

441.

The joint powers agreement entered into pursuant to this article may be modified, as necessary, to include other public agencies contiguous to the local agencies specified in Section 440.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1028, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

442.

For the purposes of this article, the power to provide a short-term solution to the problem of housing for military personnel stationed at Los Angeles Air Force Base shall be a power common to the contracting parties specified in this article, as required by Section 6502 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1028, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

443.

The Department of Housing and Community Development shall not bear the costs to implement or administer any housing program established pursuant to the joint powers agreement authorized by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1028, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

443.5.

No moneys received by or administered by the state under the federal HOME program which is part of the Cranston-Gonzalez National Affordable Housing Act (P.L. 101-625) shall be used for purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1028, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

444.
